Utah statutes.
67-1a-1.   Intent of Legislature.
It is the intent of the Legislature to emphasize the significant
responsibilities and duties assigned to the lieutenant governor of the state.
As the second highest official of the state, the lieutenant governor is next
in command of the executive department in the event of death, removal,
resignation, or disability of the governor. The assignment of important
responsibilities to the lieutenant governor is essential to the continuity of
state government and for the effective use of funds appropriated to the office
of lieutenant governor.
